Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202573-908
Goods manufactured by scrutinized company; public entity; contract; conditions.

Notwithstanding sections 73-904 and 73-906, a public entity may enter into a contract for goods manufactured by a scrutinized company if:

(1)(a) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such goods;

(b) The contract is preapproved by the Department of Administrative Services; and

(c) Not procuring such good would pose a greater threat to the state than the threat associated with the good itself; or

(2) The purchasing entity is an electric supplier that is not out of compliance with the Critical Infrastructure Protection requirements issued by the North American Electric Reliability Corporation.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 30.